02_Morphology/morphological_analysis_practical.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>       ! Noun
%<sg%>      ! Singular
%<pl%>      ! Plural
%<nom%>     ! Nominative case
%<gen%>     ! Genitive case
%<poss%>    ! Possessive
%>          ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%> # ; ! "कुत्ता" (dog)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%> # ; ! "कुत्ते"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%> # ; ! "बाल" (hair)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%> # ; ! "बालें"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "आदमी" (man)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "लोग"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "गाड़ी" (car)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "गाड़ियाँ"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "मक़ान" (house)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "मक़ानें"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "बच्चा" (child)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "बच्चे"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "फूल" (flower)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "फूल"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "किताब" (book)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "किताबें"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "गर्ल" (girl)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "गर्ल्स"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "बिल्डिंग" (building)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "बिल्डिंगें"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "खिड़की" (window)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "खिड़कियाँ"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "टीचर" (teacher)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "टीचर्स"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "टेलीविज़न" (television)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "टेलीविज़न"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "स्कूल" (school)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<nom%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "स्कूलें"

%<n%>: %<sg%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "ट्री" (tree)
%<n%>: %<pl%>:%<gen%>:%<poss%> # ; ! "ट्रीज़"
